Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202689-187.05
Permit; posting; changes requiring notice to department.

(1) A weighing and measuring establishment which has a permanent location for commercial weighing and measuring devices shall have a valid permit posted in a conspicuous place at the establishment, and there shall not be a change in ownership, location, or business name without the permitholder obtaining a new permit. Any permit for such establishment shall lapse automatically upon a change of ownership, location, or business name.

(2) A weighing and measuring establishment which does not have a permanent location for commercial weighing and measuring devices shall have a copy of a valid permit posted on or about each device and shall not have a change in ownership, business name, or permanent mailing address without the permitholder obtaining a new permit. Any permit for such establishment shall lapse automatically upon a change of ownership, business name, or permanent mailing address.

(3) The holder of any weighing and measuring establishment permit shall notify the department in writing at least thirty days prior to any change requiring a new permit under subsection (1) or (2) of this section. A permitholder shall notify the department in writing before there is a change of the name or address of the person authorized to receive notices and orders of the department.

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 16;

Laws 1999, LB 473, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB245, § 15.